Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-101.05
Mortgage loan; escrow account; how established and maintained.

No lender, in connection with a mortgage loan, shall require the borrower or prospective borrower:

(1) To deposit in any escrow account which may be established in connection with such loan for the purpose of assuring payment of taxes, insurance premiums, or other charges with respect to the property, prior to or upon the date of settlement, an aggregate sum in excess of the total amount of such taxes, insurance premiums, and other charges which are attributable to the period beginning on the last date on which each such charge would have been paid under the normal lending practice of the lender if the selection of each such date constitutes prudent lending practice and ending on the due date of its first full installment payment under the mortgage plus a cushion that shall be no greater than one-sixth of the estimated total annual payments to be made from the escrow account for such taxes, insurance premiums, and other charges during the twelve-month period beginning on the date of settlement; or

(2) To deposit in any such escrow account in any month beginning after the date of settlement a sum for the purpose of assuring payment of taxes, insurance premiums, or other charges with respect to the property in excess of one-twelfth of the total annual escrow account payments which the lender reasonably anticipates paying from the escrow account for such taxes, insurance premiums, and other charges plus a cushion that shall be no greater than one-sixth of the estimated total annual payments to be made from the escrow account for such taxes, insurance premiums, and other charges, except that if the lender determines that a shortage exists or that there will be a deficiency on the due date the lender shall not be prohibited from requiring additional monthly deposits in such escrow account of pro rata portions of the shortage or deficiency corresponding to the number of months from the date of the lender's determination of such shortage or deficiency to the date upon which such taxes, insurance premiums, and other charges would be paid under the normal lending practice of the lender if the selection of each such date constitutes prudent lending practice.

Laws 1976, LB 502, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 554, § 1.